utilities/dictionaries/eu_EU-Basque.aff
FLAG num
SFX 359 0 tikorik .
SFX 359 0 tikotik .
SFX 359 0 tikotzat .
SFX 359 0 tikoz .
SFX 359 0 tzako .
SFX 359 0 tzakoa .
SFX 359 0 tzakoagan .
SFX 359 0 tzakoagana .
SFX 359 0 tzakoaganaino .
SFX 359 0 tzakoaganantz .
SFX 359 0 tzakoagandik .
SFX 359 0 tzakoagatik .
SFX 359 0 tzakoago .
SFX 359 0 tzakoak .
SFX 359 0 tzakoan .
SFX 359 0 tzakoarekin .
SFX 359 0 tzakoaren .
SFX 359 0 tzakoarendako .
SFX 359 0 tzakoarentzat .
SFX 359 0 tzakoari .
SFX 359 0 tzakoaz .
SFX 359 0 tzakoegi .
SFX 359 0 tzakoei .
SFX 359 0 tzakoek .
SFX 359 0 tzakoekin .
SFX 359 0 tzakoen .
SFX 359 0 tzakoendako .
SFX 359 0 tzakoentzat .
SFX 359 0 tzakoez .
SFX 359 0 tzakogatik .
SFX 359 0 tzakok .
SFX 359 0 tzakooi .
SFX 359 0 tzakook .
SFX 359 0 tzakookin .
SFX 359 0 tzakoon .
SFX 359 0 tzakoontzat .
SFX 359 0 tzakootaz .
SFX 359 0 tzakooz .
SFX 359 0 tzakora .
SFX 359 0 tzakoraino .
SFX 359 0 tzakorantz .
SFX 359 0 tzakorat .
SFX 359 0 tzakorekin .
SFX 359 0 tzakoren .
SFX 359 0 tzakorendako .
SFX 359 0 tzakorentzat .
SFX 359 0 tzakori .
SFX 359 0 tzakorik .
SFX 359 0 tzakotik .
SFX 359 0 tzakotzat .
SFX 359 0 tzakoz .
SFX 359 0 tzat .
SFX 359 0 z .
SFX 359 0 zko .
SFX 359 0 zkoa .
SFX 359 0 zkoagan .
SFX 359 0 zkoagana .
SFX 359 0 zkoaganaino .
SFX 359 0 zkoaganantz .
SFX 359 0 zkoagandik .
SFX 359 0 zkoagatik .
SFX 359 0 zkoago .
SFX 359 0 zkoak .
SFX 359 0 zkoan .
SFX 359 0 zkoarekin .
SFX 359 0 zkoaren .
SFX 359 0 zkoarendako .
SFX 359 0 zkoarentzat .
SFX 359 0 zkoari .
SFX 359 0 zkoaz .
SFX 359 0 zkoegi .
SFX 359 0 zkoei .
SFX 359 0 zkoek .
SFX 359 0 zkoekin .
SFX 359 0 zkoen .
SFX 359 0 zkoendako .
SFX 359 0 zkoentzat .
SFX 359 0 zkoez .
SFX 359 0 zkogatik .
SFX 359 0 zkok .
SFX 359 0 zkooi .
SFX 359 0 zkook .
SFX 359 0 zkookin .
SFX 359 0 zkoon .
SFX 359 0 zkoontzat .
SFX 359 0 zkootaz .
SFX 359 0 zkooz .
SFX 359 0 zkora .
SFX 359 0 zkoraino .
SFX 359 0 zkorantz .
SFX 359 0 zkorat .
SFX 359 0 zkorekin .
SFX 359 0 zkoren .
SFX 359 0 zkorendako .
SFX 359 0 zkorentzat .
SFX 359 0 zkori .
SFX 359 0 zkorik .
SFX 359 0 zkotik .
SFX 359 0 zkotzat .
SFX 359 0 zkoz .
SFX 358 Y 2
SFX 358 0 0 .
SFX 358 0 tzat .
SFX 216 Y 26
SFX 216 0 0 .
SFX 216 0 garren .
SFX 216 0 garren/1,397 .
SFX 216 0 gatik .
SFX 216 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 216 0 k .
SFX 216 0 ko .
SFX 216 0 koa .
SFX 216 0 koak .
SFX 216 0 koa/1,372 .
SFX 216 0 ko/1,394 .
SFX 216 0 rekin .
SFX 216 0 reki/1,370 .
SFX 216 0 ren .
SFX 216 0 rendako .
SFX 216 0 rentzat .
SFX 216 0 rentza/1,370 .
SFX 216 0 ren/1,371 .
SFX 216 0 re/1,382 .
SFX 216 0 ri .
SFX 216 0 rik .
SFX 216 0 ta/1,375 .
SFX 216 0 tzat .
SFX 216 0 tza/1,370 .
SFX 216 0 z .
SFX 216 0 z/1,370 .
SFX 217 Y 109
SFX 217 0 0 .
SFX 217 0 ño .
SFX 217 0 ño/1,369 .
SFX 217 0 a .
SFX 217 0 ago .
SFX 217 0 ago/1,362 .
SFX 217 0 ak .
SFX 217 0 an .
SFX 217 0 araz .
SFX 217 0 araz/1,364 .
SFX 217 0 arekin .
SFX 217 0 areki/1,370 .
SFX 217 0 aren .
SFX 217 0 arendako .
SFX 217 0 arentzat .
SFX 217 0 arentza/1,370 .
SFX 217 0 aren/1,371 .
SFX 217 0 ari .
SFX 217 0 az .
SFX 217 0 a/1,372 .
SFX 217 0 dun .
SFX 217 0 dun/1,373 .
SFX 217 0 egi .
SFX 217 0 egi/1,362 .
SFX 217 0 ei .
SFX 217 0 ek .
SFX 217 0 ekin .
SFX 217 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 217 0 en .
SFX 217 0 endako .
SFX 217 0 entzat .
SFX 217 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 217 0 en/1,374 .
SFX 217 0 eta/1,375 .
SFX 217 0 ez .
SFX 217 0 garri .
SFX 217 0 garri/1,361 .
SFX 217 0 gatik .
SFX 217 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 217 0 k .
SFX 217 0 keran .
SFX 217 0 ki .
SFX 217 0 ki/1,376 .
SFX 217 0 ko .
SFX 217 0 koa .
SFX 217 0 koak .
SFX 217 0 koa/1,377 .
SFX 217 0 ko/1,378 .
SFX 217 0 men .
SFX 217 0 mendu .
SFX 217 0 mendu/1,362 .
SFX 217 0 men/1,363 .
SFX 217 0 oi .
SFX 217 0 ok .
SFX 217 0 okin .
SFX 217 0 oki/1,370 .
SFX 217 0 on .
SFX 217 0 ontzat .
SFX 217 0 ontza/1,370 .
SFX 217 0 on/1,371 .
SFX 217 0 otaz .
SFX 217 0 ota/1,375 .
SFX 217 0 oz .
SFX 217 0 pe .
SFX 217 0 pen .
SFX 217 0 pen/1,363 .
SFX 217 0 pe/1,379 .
SFX 217 0 ra .
SFX 217 0 raino .
SFX 217 0 raino/1,370 .
SFX 217 0 rantz .
SFX 217 0 rantz/1,380 .
SFX 217 0 ranz/1,370 .
SFX 217 0 rat .
SFX 217 0 ra/1,381 .
SFX 217 0 rekin .
SFX 217 0 reki/1,370 .
SFX 217 0 ren .
SFX 217 0 rendako .
SFX 217 0 rentzat .
SFX 217 0 rentza/1,370 .
SFX 217 0 ren/1,371 .
SFX 217 0 re/1,382 .
SFX 217 0 ri .
SFX 217 0 rik .
SFX 217 0 riko .
SFX 217 0 rikoa .
SFX 217 0 rikoak .
SFX 217 0 rikoa/1,377 .
SFX 217 0 riko/1,378 .
SFX 217 0 r/1,383 .
SFX 217 0 ta .
SFX 217 0 tasun .
SFX 217 0 tasun/1,363 .
SFX 217 0 ta/1,375 .
SFX 217 0 tik .
SFX 217 0 ti/1,370 .
SFX 217 0 txo .
SFX 217 0 txo/1,369 .
SFX 217 0 tzaile .
SFX 217 0 tzaile/1,366 .
SFX 217 0 tzar .
SFX 217 0 tzarr/1,384 .
SFX 217 0 tzar/1,385 .
SFX 217 0 tzat .
SFX 217 0 tza/1,370 .
SFX 217 0 xe/1,386 .
SFX 217 0 z .
SFX 217 0 z/1,370 .
SFX 214 Y 1
SFX 214 0 taz .
SFX 215 Y 120
SFX 215 0 0 .
SFX 215 0 ño .
SFX 215 0 ño/1,369 .
SFX 215 0 a .
SFX 215 0 ago .
SFX 215 0 ago/1,362 .
SFX 215 0 ak .
SFX 215 0 an .
SFX 215 0 araz .
SFX 215 0 araz/1,364 .
SFX 215 0 arekin .
SFX 215 0 areki/1,370 .
SFX 215 0 aren .
SFX 215 0 arendako .
SFX 215 0 arentzat .
SFX 215 0 arentza/1,370 .
SFX 215 0 aren/1,371 .
SFX 215 0 ari .
SFX 215 0 az .
SFX 215 0 a/1,372 .
SFX 215 0 dun .
SFX 215 0 dun/1,373 .
SFX 215 0 dura .
SFX 215 0 dura/1,359 .
SFX 215 0 dur/1,360 .
SFX 215 0 egi .
SFX 215 0 egi/1,362 .
SFX 215 0 ei .
SFX 215 0 ek .
SFX 215 0 ekin .
SFX 215 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 215 0 en .
SFX 215 0 endako .
SFX 215 0 entzat .
SFX 215 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 215 0 en/1,374 .
SFX 215 0 eta/1,375 .
SFX 215 0 ez .
SFX 215 0 garri .
SFX 215 0 garri/1,361 .
SFX 215 0 gatik .
SFX 215 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 215 0 k .
SFX 215 0 keran .
SFX 215 0 ki .
SFX 215 0 ki/1,376 .
SFX 215 0 ko .
SFX 215 0 koa .
SFX 215 0 koak .
SFX 215 0 koa/1,377 .
SFX 215 0 ko/1,378 .
SFX 215 0 men .
SFX 215 0 mendu .
SFX 215 0 mendu/1,362 .
SFX 215 0 men/1,363 .
SFX 215 0 oi .
SFX 215 0 ok .
SFX 215 0 okin .
SFX 215 0 oki/1,370 .
SFX 215 0 on .
SFX 215 0 ontzat .
SFX 215 0 ontza/1,370 .
SFX 215 0 on/1,371 .
SFX 215 0 otaz .
SFX 215 0 ota/1,375 .
SFX 215 0 oz .
SFX 215 0 pe .
SFX 215 0 pen .
SFX 215 0 pen/1,363 .
SFX 215 0 pe/1,379 .
SFX 215 0 ra .
SFX 215 0 raino .
SFX 215 0 raino/1,370 .
SFX 215 0 rantz .
SFX 215 0 rantz/1,380 .
SFX 215 0 ranz/1,370 .
SFX 215 0 rat .
SFX 215 0 ra/1,381 .
SFX 215 0 rekin .
SFX 215 0 reki/1,370 .
SFX 215 0 ren .
SFX 215 0 rendako .
SFX 215 0 rentzat .
SFX 215 0 rentza/1,370 .
SFX 215 0 ren/1,371 .
SFX 215 0 re/1,382 .
SFX 215 0 ri .
SFX 215 0 rik .
SFX 215 0 riko .
SFX 215 0 rikoa .
SFX 215 0 rikoak .
SFX 215 0 rikoa/1,377 .
SFX 215 0 riko/1,378 .
SFX 215 0 r/1,383 .
SFX 215 0 ta .
SFX 215 0 tasun .
SFX 215 0 tasun/1,363 .
SFX 215 0 ta/1,375 .
SFX 215 0 tik .
SFX 215 0 ti/1,370 .
SFX 215 0 tu .
SFX 215 0 tu/1,365 .
SFX 215 0 txo .
SFX 215 0 txo/1,369 .
SFX 215 0 tzaile .
SFX 215 0 tzaile/1,366 .
SFX 215 0 tzar .
SFX 215 0 tzarr/1,384 .
SFX 215 0 tzar/1,385 .
SFX 215 0 tzat .
SFX 215 0 tza/1,370 .
SFX 215 0 tze .
SFX 215 0 tzear .
SFX 215 0 tzeke .
SFX 215 0 tzen .
SFX 215 0 tzen/1,367 .
SFX 215 0 tze/1,368 .
SFX 215 0 xe/1,386 .
SFX 215 0 z .
SFX 215 0 z/1,370 .
SFX 212 Y 25
SFX 212 0 a .
SFX 212 0 ak .
SFX 212 0 arekin .
SFX 212 0 areki/1,370 .
SFX 212 0 aren .
SFX 212 0 arendako .
SFX 212 0 arentzat .
SFX 212 0 arentza/1,370 .
SFX 212 0 aren/1,371 .
SFX 212 0 ari .
SFX 212 0 az .
SFX 212 0 ean .
SFX 212 0 eko .
SFX 212 0 eko/1,378 .
SFX 212 0 era .
SFX 212 0 eraino .
SFX 212 0 eraino/1,370 .
SFX 212 0 erantz .
SFX 212 0 erantz/1,380 .
SFX 212 0 eranz/1,370 .
SFX 212 0 erat .
SFX 212 0 era/1,381 .
SFX 212 0 er/1,383 .
SFX 212 0 etik .
SFX 212 0 eti/1,370 .
SFX 213 Y 18
SFX 213 0 garri .
SFX 213 0 garri/1,361 .
SFX 213 0 men .
SFX 213 0 mendu .
SFX 213 0 mendu/1,362 .
SFX 213 0 men/1,363 .
SFX 213 0 pen .
SFX 213 0 pen/1,363 .
SFX 213 0 taraz .
SFX 213 0 taraz/1,364 .
SFX 213 0 te .
SFX 213 0 tear .
SFX 213 0 teke .
SFX 213 0 ten .
SFX 213 0 ten/1,367 .
SFX 213 0 te/1,368 .
SFX 213 0 tu .
SFX 213 0 tu/1,365 .
